Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Article 1. Administration.

Collateral references. —

81 C.J.S., Social Security and Public Welfare, §§ 265-270.

Sec. 23.20.005.
Purpose.

This chapter shall be liberally construed to accomplish its purposes to promote employment security by increasing opportunities for placement through the maintenance of a system of public employment offices and to provide through the accumulation of reserves for the payment of compensation to individuals with respect to their unemployment.

The legislature declares its intention to provide for carrying out the purposes of this chapter in cooperation with the appropriate agencies of other states and the federal government, as part of a nationwide employment security program, and particularly to provide for meeting the requirements of Title III of the Federal Social Security Act, the requirements of 26 U.S.C. 3303 and 3304 (Federal Unemployment Tax Act, Internal Revenue Code), and the Act of Congress approved June 6, 1933, entitled “An Act to provide for the establishment of a national employment system and for cooperation with the states in the promotion of such system, and for other purposes” (cited in this chapter as the Wagner-Peyser Act), and Title IV of the Act of Congress approved June 22, 1944, each as amended, in order to obtain for this state and its citizens the grants and privileges available under the federal Act. Doubt as to the proper construction of a provision of this chapter shall be resolved in favor of conformity with the requirements of the federal Act.

History.

(§ 101 ch 5 ESLA 1955)

Cross references. —

For Title III of the Social Security Act, see 42 U.S.C. §§ 501-504; for the Wagner-Peyser Act, see 29 U.S.C. §§ 49 — 49c, 49d, 49g, 49h, 49j, 49k and 557; for Title IV of the Act of June 22, 1944, see P.L. 78-346 (Servicemen’s Readjustment Act of 1944).

Sec. 23.20.010.
Policy.

As a guide to the interpretation and application of this chapter, the public policy of the state is declared to be as follows: Economic insecurity due to involuntary unemployment is a serious menace to the health, morals, and welfare of the people of the state. Involuntary unemployment is, therefore, a subject of general interest and concern which requires appropriate action by the legislature to prevent its spread and to lighten its burden and to maintain purchasing power as a factor in stabilizing the economy of the state.
This can be accomplished by encouraging employers to provide more stable employment and by the systematic accumulation of funds during periods of employment, from which benefits may be paid for periods of involuntary unemployment.
The legislature, therefore, declares that, in its considered judgment, the public good and the general welfare of the citizens of the state require the enactment of this measure, under the police power of the state, for the operation of public employment service offices and for the establishment of an employment security program to be used for the benefit of eligible unemployed persons.

History.

(§ 102 ch 5 ESLA 1955)

Secs. 23.20.012 , 23.20.015.
Policy on temporary unemployment compensation; annual report. [Repealed, § 25 ch 122 SLA 1977.]

Sec. 23.20.020.
Maintenance and protection of fund.

If possible, there shall be provided in the fund a reserve against the liability in future years to pay benefits. Whenever the department believes that a change in contribution or benefit rates is necessary to protect the solvency of the fund, it shall promptly inform the governor and the legislature, and make recommendations with respect to a change.

History.

(§ 306 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 4 ch 60 SLA 1960)

Sec. 23.20.021.
Certain appropriations to the fund.

In accordance with AS 37.07 (Executive Budget Act), the legislature may appropriate money to the fund.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2013)

Effective dates. —

Section 14, ch. 50, SLA 2013 makes this section effective July 1, 2013.

Sec. 23.20.022.
Actuarial studies.

On December 1, 1975, the commissioner shall submit to the governor an actuarial study of the unemployment tax and benefit structures established under this chapter. Thereafter, an actuarial study of the structures shall be submitted to the governor on December 1 of every second year.

History.

(§ 1 ch 43 SLA 1973)

Sec. 23.20.025.
Establishment of Employment Security Advisory Council. [Repealed, § 16 ch 61 SLA 1995. For Alaska Human Resource Investment Council, see AS 23.15.550 et seq.]

For Alaska Human Resource Investment Council, see AS

23.15.550

et seq.

For Alaska Human Resource Investment Council, see AS

23.15.550

et seq.

Sec. 23.20.030.
Director.

Subject to AS

23.20.035

, the department shall appoint a director. The director shall administer this chapter under the authority which the department delegates. The department may not delegate the power to adopt, amend, or rescind regulations.

The department shall prescribe the divisions, subdivisions, and units of the organization to be directed by the director to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The director may require a person handling money or signing checks to give bond. The director shall have an official seal which shall be judicially noticed.

[Repealed, § 59 ch 59 SLA 1982.]

History.

(§ 306 ch 5 ESLA 1955; § 310 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 4 ch 60 SLA 1960; am § 59 ch 59 SLA 1982)

Sec. 23.20.035.
Duties and powers of director.

The director, in accordance with AS

23.20.020

and

23.20.030

, shall employ persons, including a deputy director, make expenditures, require reports, make investigations, and take other action that the director considers necessary to carry out the authority of the office.

The director may delegate powers and duties to a deputy director or to a responsible employee of the agency when the director is absent from the office. The deputy director shall assume the duties and powers of the director when that office is vacant.

History.

(§ 311 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 1 ch 75 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 9 SLA 1980)

Sec. 23.20.040.
Qualifications of director.

A person may not be appointed director unless the person is a citizen of the United States and qualified by training and experience to perform the duties of the office.

History.

(§ 310 ch 5 ESLA 1955)

Sec. 23.20.045.
Regulations.

The department may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) necessary to administer this chapter.

History.

(§ 312 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 2 ch 9 SLA 1980; am § 26 ch 21 SLA 1985)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Sec. 23.20.050.
Publications.

The department shall have printed for distribution to the public the text of this chapter, the department’s regulations, the annual reports of the commissioner to the governor, and any other material the department considers relevant and suitable.
The department shall furnish copies of these to any person upon application.

History.

(§ 313 ch 5 ESLA 1955)

Sec. 23.20.055.
Department records; admissibility.

The department may make summaries, compilations, photographs, duplications, or reproductions of records, reports, or transcripts of them which it considers advisable for the effective and economical preservation of the information contained in them.

The summaries, compilations, photographs, duplications, or reproductions, duly authenticated, are admissible in a proceeding under this chapter, including a court action, if the original records would be admissible.

The department may provide by regulation for the destruction, after a reasonable period, of records, reports, transcripts, other papers in its custody, or reproductions of them, when their preservation is no longer necessary for a purpose necessary to the administration of this chapter.

History.

(§ 316 ch 5 ESLA 1955)

Sec. 23.20.060.
Oaths and witnesses.

In administering this chapter, the department may administer oaths and affirmations, take depositions, certify to official acts, and issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and production of books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, and other records considered necessary as evidence in connection with a disputed claim or the administration of this chapter.

History.

(§ 318 ch 5 ESLA 1955)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Sec. 23.20.065.
Subpoenas.

In case of contumacy, or refusal to obey a subpoena issued to any person, the superior court may, upon application by the department, issue an order requiring the person to appear before the department to produce evidence if ordered, or to give testimony touching the matter under investigation or in question.
Failure to obey the order of the court is punishable as contempt.

History.

(§ 320 ch 5 ESLA 1955)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Sec. 23.20.070.
Self-incrimination.

A person may not be excused from attending and testifying or from producing books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, and other records before the department, or in obedience to a subpoena of the department in a cause or proceeding before the department, or an appeal tribunal, on the ground that the testimony or evidence required of the person may tend to incriminate the person or subject the person to a penalty or forfeiture.
An individual may not be prosecuted or subjected to a penalty or forfeiture for or on account of a transaction, matter, or thing concerning which the individual is compelled, after having claimed the privilege against self-incrimination, to testify or produce evidence. However, the individual testifying is not exempt from prosecution and punishment for perjury committed in testifying.

History.

(§ 321 ch 5 ESLA 1955)

Sec. 23.20.075.
Acquisition of land and buildings.

The department may acquire in the name of the state by term purchase agreements based on competitive bids in accordance with AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code) land and buildings upon terms and conditions that are approved by the Bureau of Employment Security of the United States, or its successor, for the purpose of providing office space for the department at a place which the department finds necessary and suitable.

An agreement made for the purchase of premises is subject to the approval of the attorney general and does not subject the state to liability for the payment of the purchase price, except from money which is allocated to the state by the United States Bureau of Employment Security or its successor for the administration of this chapter.

All money received from the United States for the payments authorized in this section for land and buildings shall be deposited in the employment security administration fund in the state treasury and is appropriated from that fund for purposes of this chapter.

It is the policy of this state that if premises are purchased under this chapter, the department shall be housed in the premises without further payment by the United States, except for general maintenance, utilities, and janitorial services, or if, in the future, it is desirable to move the offices, other suitable similar space will be furnished by the state without further payment for the space by the United States, except for general maintenance, utilities, and janitorial services.

History.

(§ 324 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 21 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Sec. 23.20.077.
Application for demonstration programs.

The Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall pursue application with appropriate agencies to qualify this state as a pilot state for demonstration programs related to helping unemployed Alaskans regain employment, if administrative money is available to operate the project.

The Department of Labor and Workforce Development may waive provisions of this chapter for individuals who participate in a demonstration project, to the extent required for the state to participate in the project.

History.

(§ 28 ch 100 SLA 1989)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 23.20.533.
Renumbered in 1989.

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 23.20.080.
Federal-state cooperation.

In the administration of this chapter, the department shall cooperate, to the extent consistent with this chapter, with the Secretary of Labor, and shall take action through the adoption of regulations, administration methods, and standards that is necessary to obtain for this state and its citizens all advantages available under 26 U.S.C. 3303 and 3304 (Internal Revenue Code) and the Wagner-Peyser Act, as amended. The department shall comply with the regulations of the Secretary of Labor relating to the receipt or expenditure by this state of money granted under these federal laws and shall make reports in the form and containing the information which the Secretary of Labor requires. The department shall comply with the provisions which the Secretary of Labor may from time to time find necessary to assure the correctness and verification of the reports. The department may cooperate with every agency of the United States charged with the administration of an unemployment insurance law.

Notwithstanding AS

23.20.330

—

23.20.409

, after notifying the legislature and other interested parties of its intent, the department may implement an unemployment compensation program not otherwise provided for in this chapter in accordance with this subsection. A program implemented under this subsection is repealed on the date two years after the date on which it took effect unless its implementation is approved by law. The program may be implemented only if

the program is authorized by the United States Secretary of Labor;

the governor approves the implementation in writing;

the commissioner of labor and workforce development determines that the program will result in the receipt of additional federal money to carry out the purposes of this chapter and will produce a net monetary gain to the state and its people; and

the implementation will not require spending money from the general fund other than money received from the federal government for the program.

History.

(§ 322 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 1 ch 2 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (b) of this section, “commissioner of labor” was changed to “commissioner of labor and workforce development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Cross references. —

For Wagner-Peyser Act, see the cross references at AS

23.20.005

.

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Legislative history reports. —

For Governor’s transmittal letter in connection with the enactment of subsection (b) by § 1, ch. 2, SLA 1992 (CCS SB 349), see 1992 Senate Journal 1788.

Sec. 23.20.081.
Emergency unemployment compensation program. [Repealed, §§ 9, 15 ch 28 SLA 1993.]

Sec. 23.20.085.
Interstate benefit payments.

The department shall enter into reciprocal arrangements with appropriate and duly authorized agencies of other states or of the federal government, or both, so that potential rights to benefits under this chapter may constitute the basis for payment of claims by another state or by the federal government and potential rights to benefits accumulated under the law of another state or of the federal government may constitute the basis for the payment of claims by this state. These claims shall be paid under the provisions of this chapter or under the provisions of the law of the other state or of the federal government or under that combination of the provisions of both laws as is agreed upon as being fair and reasonable to all affected interests. An arrangement under this section may not be entered into unless it contains provision for reimbursement to the fund for those claims paid on the basis of wages and service subject to the law of another state or of the federal government, and provision for reimbursement from the fund for those claims paid by another state or by the federal government on the basis of wages and service subject to this chapter. Reimbursements paid from the fund under this section are considered to be benefits for the purposes of this chapter.

The department shall participate in any arrangements for the payment of benefits on the basis of combining an individual’s wages and employment covered under this chapter with the individual’s wages and employment covered under the unemployment insurance laws of other states which are approved by the United States Secretary of Labor in consultation with the state employment security agencies as reasonably calculated to assure the prompt and full payment of benefits in such situations and which arrangements shall include provisions for

applying the base period of a single state law to a claim involving the combining of an individual’s wages and employment covered under two or more state unemployment insurance laws, and

avoiding the duplicate use of wages and employment by reason of the combining.

In this section, the terms “other state” and “another state” include any state or territory of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the Virgin Islands, and Canada, and where applicable include the federal government.

History.

(§ 325 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 5 ch 60 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 106 SLA 1971; am § 1 ch 122 SLA 1977)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under the terms of § 30, ch. 122, SLA 1977, the 1977 amendment was effective January 1, 1978, the day after the date the Secretary of Labor approved the Virgin Islands Employment Security Law.

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Sec. 23.20.090.
Reciprocal coverage and cooperation.

The commissioner may enter into reciprocal arrangements with appropriate and authorized agencies of other states or of the federal government, or both, whereby, notwithstanding AS

23.20.395

,

service performed by an individual for a single employing unit for which service is customarily performed by the individual in more than one state is considered service performed entirely within any one of the states in which (A) a part of the individual’s service is performed, (B) the individual resides, or (C) the employing unit maintains a place of business; provided, that there is in effect, as to the service, an approved election by an employing unit with the acquiescence of the individual, under which service performed by the individual for the employing unit is considered performed entirely within that state; and

service performed by not more than three individuals, on a portion of a day but not necessarily simultaneously, for a single employing unit which customarily operates in more than one state is considered service performed entirely within the state in which the employing unit maintains the headquarters of its business; provided, that there is in effect, as to the service, an approved election by an employing unit with the affirmative consent of each individual, under which service performed by the individual for the employing unit is considered performed entirely within that state.

To the extent permissible under the laws and constitution of the United States, the department may enter into an arrangement of the character provided in this section with the agency of a foreign government administering an employment security law.

History.

(§ 325.1 ch 5 ESLA 1955, added by § 6 ch 60 SLA 1960)

Sec. 23.20.095.
Exchange of services, facilities, and information.

The administration of this chapter and of other state and federal unemployment compensation and public employment service laws will be promoted by cooperation between this state and those states and the appropriate federal agencies exchanging services and making facilities and information available.

The department may make investigations, secure and transmit information, make available services and facilities, and exercise other powers provided in this chapter with respect to the administration of this chapter which the department considers necessary or appropriate to facilitate the administration of the unemployment compensation or public employment service law of another state or the federal government.

History.

(§ 326 ch 5 ESLA 1955)

Sec. 23.20.100.
Public employment offices.

The department shall establish and maintain free public employment offices in the number and in the places which may be necessary for the administration of this chapter and for the purposes of performing functions which are within the scope of the Wagner-Peyser Act, as amended.
The provisions of the Wagner-Peyser Act, as amended, are accepted by this state, and the department is designated the agency of this state for the purposes of that Act.
All money received by this state under that Act shall be paid into the employment security administration fund and shall be expended solely for the maintenance of the state system of public employment offices.

History.

(§ 331 ch 5 ESLA 1955)

Cross references. —

For the Wagner-Peyser Act, see the cross references at AS

23.20.005

.

Sec. 23.20.105.
Employing units to keep records and reports.

An employing unit shall keep work records containing information which the department prescribes.
The records shall be open to inspection and may be copied by the department at any reasonable time and as often as may be necessary.
The department may require an employing unit to submit sworn or unsworn reports, with respect to persons employed by it, which are considered necessary for the administration of this chapter.

History.

(§ 315 ch 5 ESLA 1955)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Sec. 23.20.110.
Information obtained by department.

Except for disclosures required by 42 U.S.C. 503, as amended, and 20 C.F.R. 603, as amended, and disclosures authorized under this section, the department shall hold information obtained from an employing unit or individual in the course of administering this chapter and determinations as to the benefit rights of an individual confidential and may not disclose them or open them to public inspection in a manner that reveals the identity of the individual or employing unit. A claimant or an employing unit is entitled to information from the records of the department only to the extent necessary to properly present or protest a claim or determination under this chapter. The department may not provide information that is confidential under this section to a person for use in any civil or administrative matter not directly involving the presentation or protest of a claim or determination under this chapter; however, subject to restrictions that the department prescribes by regulation, the information must be made available to the United States Department of Homeland Security, Bureau of Citizenship and Immigration Services, for the purpose of verifying a claimant’s immigration status, to the United States Railroad Retirement Board, to an agency of this state or another state or federal agency charged with the administration of an unemployment compensation law or the maintenance of a system of public employment offices, to the United States Department of the Treasury, Internal Revenue Service, for the purposes of the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, or to the Department of Revenue for tax purposes. Information obtained in the course of administering this chapter or in connection with the administration of the employment service may be made available to persons or agencies for purposes appropriate to the operation of a public employment service or the administration of employment and training programs planned or coordinated by the Alaska Workforce Investment Board under AS

23.15.550

—

23.15.585

.

Upon request the department shall furnish to an agency of the United States charged with the administration of public works or assistance through public employment, and may furnish to a state agency similarly charged, the name, address, ordinary occupation, and employment status of each recipient of benefits and the recipient’s rights to benefits under this chapter.

Upon request of an agency of this or another state or of the federal government which administers or operates one or more programs of public assistance under either federal law or the law of this state, or which is charged with any duty or responsibility under any such program, and if that agency is required by law to impose safeguards for the confidentiality of information at least as effective as required under this section, the department shall provide, with respect to any named individual specified by the requesting agency, the following information:

whether the individual is receiving, has received, or has made application for unemployment compensation under this chapter;

the period, if any, for which unemployment compensation was payable and the weekly rate of compensation paid;

the individual’s most recent address; and

whether the individual has refused an offer of employment, and, if so, the date of the refusal and a description of the employment refused, including duties, conditions of employment, and rate of pay.

The department may require that an agency or authorized person to which it provides information under this section reimburse the department for its costs of furnishing that information.

The department shall provide wage and unemployment compensation information

requested by a state or federal agency under an income and eligibility verification system that meets the requirements of 42 U.S.C. 1320b-7 (Social Security Act);

as required by federal law for child support purposes;

to the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services for the National Directory of New Hires as required by 42 U.S.C. 503 and 42 U.S.C. 653; or

to a state or a political subdivision of a state that administers a program funded under 42 U.S.C. 601 — 619 that provides temporary assistance for needy families.

[Repealed, § 2 ch 60 SLA 1985.]

A recipient of records disclosed under this section may not use the disclosed records for a purpose other than the purpose for which the disclosure was made. The requirements concerning the confidentiality of information obtained in the course of administering this chapter apply to officers and employees of a state, federal, municipal, or other agency to whom the department provides information as authorized by this section.

[Repealed, § 13 ch 45 SLA 2008.]

[Repealed, § 13 ch 45 SLA 2008.]

[Repealed, § 13 ch 45 SLA 2008.]

If an individual who is applying for or participating in a housing assistance program administered by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development gives authorization, the department shall disclose, to the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development or to representatives of the housing assistance program operating the program, wage information and unemployment compensation information. The authorization shall be made by the individual on a consent form approved by the department. The form must state the information authorized to be released and require the signature of the individual. In this subsection,

“unemployment compensation information” means whether the individual is receiving, has received, or has applied for unemployment compensation, and the amount of unemployment compensation that the individual is receiving, has received, or is eligible to receive, and the individual’s current address and other contact information;

“wage information” means the social security number, or numbers if there are more than one, and quarterly wages of an employee, and the name, address, state, and, if known, federal employer identification number of an employer reporting wages under this chapter.

The department may provide information obtained under this chapter to an agency of this state or to a person under contract with the state to

verify the eligibility of an applicant for a public benefit or a publicly financed payment;

assist the state in the collection of fines, penalties, judgments of restitution on behalf of victims of crimes or delinquent acts, or other payments ordered by a court or an administrative agency; or

collect money owed to the fund under this chapter.

The department may not release information under this section to a state agency or to a person under contract with the state until the department and the agency or person have entered into a written agreement that governs the release of information. The written agreement must specify

the purpose for the information;

a description of the information to be provided;

a description of the procedure for transmitting, securing, using, and disposing of the information;

the method of reimbursement, if any, for the cost of providing the information; and

that the department may perform on-site inspections to ensure that the confidentiality requirements of this section are met.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, the department may produce statistical and other public reports based on information obtained in the course of administering this chapter, so long as the department complies with the requirements of 20 C.F.R. 603, as amended, regarding the use or release of confidential records.

Upon request and for child support purposes authorized under law, the department shall provide to the child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

, or the child support enforcement agency of another state, the following:

the name, address, social security number, ordinary occupation, and employment status of each applicant for or recipient of benefits under this chapter;

information about the applicant’s or recipient’s right to benefits under this chapter;

the name, address, and employer identification number of the applicant’s or recipient’s current or former employer;

information, if available, on the applicant or recipient concerning

earnings or other income of the applicant or recipient;

benefits from employment, including rights to or enrollment in group health care coverage; and

the type, status, location, and amount of assets of or debts owed by or to the applicant or recipient.

Upon the written request by a state district attorney, a municipal attorney, a United States attorney, or the Federal Bureau of Investigation, the department may release to the requester information under this section for the investigation or prosecution of a crime or to enforce an order of a court in a criminal matter, including enforcing probation or parole conditions.

The confidentiality requirements of this section do not apply to disclosure of decisions and records on appeal in any matter before the department as long as the federal social security number of the claimant and the employer’s federal employer identification number and federal social security number are redacted or removed before disclosure is made.

The department may provide information obtained under this chapter to another state agency if

the disclosure is authorized under 20 C.F.R. 603, as amended;

the disclosure is for the statewide workforce and education-related statistics program described under AS

14.42.035

;

the department has entered into a written agreement with the agency receiving the information in which the agency agrees not to disclose the information unless

the subsequent disclosure is for the statewide workforce and education-related statistics program described under AS

14.42.035

; and

the agency is authorized to make the subsequent disclosure under a written agreement between the agency and the Alaska Commission on Postsecondary Education.

In this section, “judgment of restitution” has the meaning given in AS

09.38.500

.

History.

(§ 323 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 1 ch 79 SLA 1969; am § 2 ch 122 SLA 1977; am § 3 ch 9 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 115 SLA 1982; am § 1, 2 ch 60 SLA 1985; am §§ 2, 3 ch 40 SLA 1988; am § 2 ch 100 SLA 1989; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 43 SLA 1996; am §§ 33, 34 ch 87 SLA 1997; am § 27 ch 58 SLA 1999; am § 1 ch 51 SLA 2000; am §§ 15, 16 ch 92 SLA 2001; am § 41 ch 86 SLA 2002; am §§ 1, 2 ch 130 SLA 2004; am §§ 1 — 7, 13 ch 45 SLA 2008; am § 3 ch 32 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

The subsections of this section were relettered in 2004, 2008, and 2018.

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency created in
AS

25.27.010

” was changed to “child support services agency created in
AS

25.27.010

” in (o) of this section in accordance with § 12(a),
ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Cross references. —

Under sec. 4, ch. 32, SLA 2018, subsection (r) “applies to information obtained by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development under AS 23.30 before, on, or after” June 19, 2018.

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2004 amendment, effective June 30, 2004, substituted “federal, or municipal agency” for “or federal agency” in subsection (g), and added subsection (q) [now (p)].

The 2008 amendment, effective May 29, 2008, rewrote subsections (a) and (n), inserted “wage and unemployment compensation” in the introductory language of subsection (e), added paragraphs (e)(3) and (4), inserted the first sentence of subsection (g), substituted “municipal, or other” for “or municipal” in the second sentence of subsection (g), repealed subsections (h) — (j), substituted “has received, or is eligible to receive, and the individual’s current address and other contact information” for “or will receive” in paragraph (k)(1), added paragraph (m)(5), added subsection (q), and made related changes.

The 2018 amendment, effective June 19, 2018, added (s) [now (r)].

Editor's notes. —

The delayed amendments to this section by § 148(c), ch. 87, SLA 1997, as amended by § 53, ch. 132, SLA 1998, which were to take effect July 1, 2001, were repealed by § 15, ch. 54, SLA 2001.

Section 45,
ch. 92, SLA 2001, provides that the amendments to subsection (

l

) and the addition of subsection (p) [now (s)], made by
ch. 92, SLA 2001, apply “to judgments or orders of restitution entered in adjudications of delinquency of minors or in criminal cases before, on, or after January 1, 2002.”

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 130, SLA 2004 (HB 490), which relates to the release of employment security records for law enforcement purposes and amends subsection (g) and adds subsection (p) of this section, see 2004 House Journal 2613 — 2614.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Although subsection (a) of this section and former AS 43.20.190(a) (replaced by AS

43.05.230(a)

) guarantee confidentiality of records in the Department of Labor and Revenue, AS

24.20.271

(6) (now AS

24.20.271

(7)) enables the Division of Audit to have access to the records of every state agency whether confidential or not. 1972 Op. Att’y Gen. (Nov. 21, 1972).

A proposed agreement between the Internal Revenue Service and the Employment Security Division allowing the IRS direct computer access to employment security information is not permissible under this section. April 24, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

Disclosure of the results of a survey conducted by the Department of Labor regarding employment of residents and nonresidents on the Eilson AFB Housing Project as part of an effort to promote local hire on the project must be limited to purely statistical information, without identification of individual contractors. October 14, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Department of Labor may not compile and release a list of the names and addresses of people who commute to Anchorage to work if it must obtain this information from the data provided by employers in compliance with the state’s employment security program. October 2, 1989 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 23.20.115.
Unauthorized disclosure of information.

A member of the department, an employee of the department, an agent of the department, or an officer or employee of a state, federal, municipal, or other agency that has been provided with information by the department who, in violation of AS

23.20.110

, makes a disclosure of information obtained from an employing unit or from an individual in the administration of this chapter, or a person who has obtained a list of applicants for work or of claimants or recipients of benefits under this chapter and who uses or permits the use of the list for a purpose not authorized by AS

23.20.110

is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 905 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 4 ch 9 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 115 SLA 1982; am § 3 ch 130 SLA 2004; am § 8 ch 45 SLA 2008)

Cross references. —

For fines and sentences for class B misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2004 amendment, effective June 30, 2004, substituted “federal or municipal agency” for “or federal agency” near the beginning of the section.

The 2008 amendment, effective May 29, 2008, substituted “municipal, or other” for “or municipal” in the first sentence.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 130, SLA 2004 (HB 490), which relates to the release of employment security records for law enforcement purposes and adds this section, see 2004 House Journal 2613 — 2614.

Sec. 23.20.120.
Examination of bank.

The department may request the Comptroller of the Currency of the United States to make or have made an examination of the correctness of a return or report of a national banking association rendered under this chapter.
The department may, in connection with the request, transmit the report or return to the Comptroller of the Currency of the United States as provided in 26 U.S.C. 3305(c) (Internal Revenue Code).

History.

(§ 323 ch 5 ESLA 1955)

Sec. 23.20.125.
Data to be collected. [Repealed, § 1 ch 74 SLA 1965.]